Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.423

Drug take-back program—Termination.

The authorization for drug take-back programs created in chapter 196, Laws of 2018 and chapter 155, Laws of 2021 shall be terminated on January 1, 2029, as provided in RCW 43.131.424.

[ 2021 c 155 s 6; 2018 c 196 s 26.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 155: See note following RCW 69.48.010.